Hawaii, session 2025, SB398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 437D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§437D-    Motor vehicle rental car additional driver fee for spouse; prohibition.  A lessor shall not charge a fee for the lessee's spouse to be an additional driver; provided that the spouse is a licensed driver and satisfies the lessor's minimum age requirement for authorized drivers." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. This Act shall not be applied so as to impair any contract existing as of the effective date of this Act in a manner violative of either the Hawaii State Constitution or article I, section 10, of the Constitution of the United States. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.